my_app/dictionaries/hunspell-la/la_LA.aff
SFX C io      ine             io        
SFX C io      ive             io        
SFX C io      iue             io          
SFX C io      ite             io        
SFX C io      iteque          io        
SFX C io      iteqve          io        
SFX C io      itene           io        
SFX C io      iteve           io        
SFX C io      iteue           io          
SFX C io      ito             io        
SFX C io      itoque          io        
SFX C io      itoqve          io        
SFX C io      itone           io        
SFX C io      itove           io        
SFX C io      itoue           io          
SFX C io      itote           io        
SFX C io      itoteque        io        
SFX C io      itoteqve        io        
SFX C io      itotene         io        
SFX C io      itoteve         io        
SFX C io      itoteue         io          
SFX C io      iunto           io        
SFX C io      ivnto           io        
SFX C io      iuntoque        io        
SFX C io      ivntoqve        io        
SFX C io      iuntone         io        
SFX C io      ivntone         io        
SFX C io      iuntove         io        
SFX C io      iuntoue         io          
SFX C io      ivntove         io        
SFX C io      ire             io        
SFX C io      ireque          io        
SFX C io      ireqve          io        
SFX C io      irene           io        
SFX C io      ireve           io        
SFX C io      ireue           io          
SFX C io      iendum          io        
SFX C io      iendvm          io        
SFX C io      iendumque       io        
SFX C io      iendvmqve       io        
SFX C io      iendumne        io        
SFX C io      iendvmne        io        
SFX C io      iendumve        io        
SFX C io      iendumue        io          
SFX C io      iendvmve        io        
SFX C io      iendi           io        
SFX C io      iendique        io        
SFX C io      iendiqve        io        
SFX C io      iendine         io        
SFX C io      iendive         io        
SFX C io      iendiue         io          
SFX C io      iendo           io        
SFX C io      iendoque        io        
SFX C io      iendoqve        io        
SFX C io      iendone         io        
SFX C io      iendove         io        
SFX C io      iendoue         io          
SFX C io      iundum          io        
SFX C io      ivndvm          io        
SFX C io      iundumque       io        
SFX C io      ivndumqve       io        
SFX C io      iundumne        io        
SFX C io      ivndvmne        io        
SFX C io      iundumve        io        
SFX C io      iundumue        io          
SFX C io      ivndvmve        io        
SFX C io      iundi           io        
SFX C io      ivndi           io        
SFX C io      iundique        io        
SFX C io      ivndiqve        io        
SFX C io      iundine         io        
SFX C io      ivndine         io        
SFX C io      iundive         io        
SFX C io      iundiue         io          
SFX C io      ivndive         io        
SFX C io      iundo           io        
SFX C io      ivndo           io        
SFX C io      iundoque        io        
SFX C io      ivndoqve        io        
SFX C io      iundone         io        
SFX C io      ivndone         io        
SFX C io      iundove         io        
SFX C io      iundoue         io          
SFX C io      ivndove         io        
SFX C io      iens            io        
SFX C io      iensque         io        
SFX C io      iensqve         io        
SFX C io      iensne          io        
SFX C io      iensve          io        
SFX C io      iensue          io          
SFX C io      ientem          io        
SFX C io      ientemque       io        
SFX C io      ientemqve       io        
SFX C io      ientemne        io        
SFX C io      ientemve        io        
SFX C io      ientemue        io          
SFX C io      ientis          io        
SFX C io      ientisque       io        
SFX C io      ientisqve       io        
SFX C io      ientisne        io        
SFX C io      ientisve        io        
SFX C io      ientisue        io          
SFX C io      ienti           io        
SFX C io      ientique        io        
SFX C io      ientiqve        io        
SFX C io      ientine         io        
SFX C io      ientive         io        
SFX C io      ientiue         io          
SFX C io      iente           io        
SFX C io      ienteque        io        
SFX C io      ienteqve        io        
SFX C io      ientene         io        
SFX C io      ienteve         io        
SFX C io      ienteue         io          
SFX C io      ientes          io        
SFX C io      ientesque       io        
SFX C io      ientesqve       io        
SFX C io      ientesne        io        
SFX C io      ientesve        io        
SFX C io      ientesue        io          
SFX C io      ientium         io        
SFX C io      ientivm         io        
SFX C io      ientiumque      io        
SFX C io      ientivmqve      io        
SFX C io      ientiumne       io        
SFX C io      ientivmne       io        
SFX C io      ientiumve       io        
SFX C io      ientiumue       io          
SFX C io      ientivmve       io        
SFX C io      ientum         io        
SFX C io      ientvm         io        
SFX C io      ientumque      io        
SFX C io      ientvmqve      io        
SFX C io      ientumne       io        
SFX C io      ientvmne       io        
SFX C io      ientumve       io        
SFX C io      ientumue       io          
SFX C io      ientvmve       io 
SFX C io      ientibus        io        
SFX C io      ientibvs        io        
SFX C io      ientibusque     io        
SFX C io      ientibvsqve     io        
SFX C io      ientibusne      io        
SFX C io      ientibvsne      io        
SFX C io      ientibusve      io        
SFX C io      ientibusue      io          
SFX C io      ientibvsve      io        
SFX C io      ientia          io        
SFX C io      ientiaque       io        
SFX C io      ientiaqve       io        
SFX C io      ientiane        io        
SFX C io      ientiave        io        
SFX C io      ientiaue        io          
SFX C io      ior             io        
SFX C io      iorque          io        
SFX C io      iorqve          io        
SFX C io      iorne           io        
SFX C io      iorve           io        
SFX C io      iorue           io          
SFX C io      iris            io        
SFX C io      irisque         io        
SFX C io      irisqve         io        
SFX C io      irisne          io        
SFX C io      irisve          io        
SFX C io      irisue          io          
SFX C io      itur            io        
SFX C io      itvr            io        
SFX C io      iturque         io        
SFX C io      itvrqve         io        
SFX C io      iturne          io        
SFX C io      itvrne          io        
SFX C io      iturve          io        
SFX C io      iturue          io          
SFX C io      itvrve          io        
SFX C io      imur            io        
SFX C io      imvr            io        
SFX C io      imurque         io        
SFX C io      imvrqve         io        
SFX C io      imurne          io        
SFX C io      imvrne          io        
SFX C io      imurve          io        
SFX C io      imurue          io          
SFX C io      imvrve          io        
SFX C io      imini           io        
SFX C io      iminique        io        
SFX C io      iminiqve        io        
SFX C io      iminine         io        
SFX C io      iminive         io        
SFX C io      iminiue         io          
SFX C io      iuntur          io        
SFX C io      ivntvr          io        
SFX C io      iunturque       io        
SFX C io      ivntvrqve       io        
SFX C io      iunturne        io        
